Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-440
Display and issuance of permits; where procured; issuing fee.

(1) The commission shall prescribe the type and design of permits. Permits shall be:

(a) Clearly visible from outside the vehicle;

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of this section, displayed by affixing the permit upon the lower portion of the driver's side interior front windshield of the motor vehicle; and

(c) For hangtag permits, displayed by being hung from the rearview mirror or placed upon the front dash if no rearview mirror is present.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the permits may be procured from the central and district offices of the commission, at designated areas of the Nebraska state park system where commission offices are maintained, from self-service vending stations at designated park areas, from designated commission employees, through Internet sales from the commission's website, from appropriate offices of county government, and from various private persons, firms, or corporations designated by the commission as permit agents. The commission and county offices or private persons, firms, or corporations designated by the commission as permit agents shall be entitled to collect and retain an issuing fee pursuant to section 37-406.

(b) Hangtag permits may be procured from the central and district offices of the commission and at designated areas of the Nebraska state park system.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 8;

Laws 1980, LB 723, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1108;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 150;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 37;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 21;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB421, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB36, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB1127, § 2.
July 18, 2026